Washington statutes.
RCW 18.96.020

Use of titles, descriptions, and phrases—License or authorization required.

(1) It is unlawful for any person to practice or offer to practice in this state, landscape architecture, or to use in connection with his or her name or otherwise assume, use, or advertise any title or description including the phrases "landscape architect," "landscape architecture," "landscape architectural," or language tending to imply that he or she is a landscape architect, unless the person is licensed or authorized to practice in the state of Washington under this chapter.

(2) A person may use the title "intern landscape architect" after graduation from an accredited degree program in landscape architecture and working under the direct supervision of a licensed landscape architect.

(3) This section does not affect the use of the phrases "landscape architect," "landscape architecture," or "landscape architectural" where a person does not practice or offer to practice landscape architecture.

[ 2009 c 370 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 158 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 370 ss 1-16, 18, 20, and 21: See note following RCW 18.96.010.

Finding—2009 c 370: See note following RCW 18.96.010.